Idaho, session 2025, S1144.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 6, Title 40, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 40-605, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
40-605. LAYING OUT OF HIGHWAYS -- WIDENING OR STRAIGHTENING NEW AND
EXISTING HIGHWAYS FOR THE PRIMARY BENEFIT OF MOTOR VEHICLES. (1) Commission-
ers may improve existing highways or lay out new highways within the county
as they determine necessary to reduce traffic congestion or motorist travel
time and for the primary benefit of motor vehicles.
(2) The right-of-way of any highway shall not be less than fifty (50)
feet wide, except to comply with applicable law or in other exceptional
cases.
(3) Existing or new pedestrian and bicycle facilities may only be im-
proved as a secondary or collateral benefit to any highway project or as
necessary to improve the safety of pedestrian and bicycle facilities near
schools, parks, or other designated pedestrian or bicycle areas.
(4) For a highway functioning as a non-residential collector or arte-
rial highway, commissioners may only increase the width, straighten, or re-
locate the highway, except as required by federal law. Commissioners shall
not decrease the width of any non-residential collector or arterial highway,
unless required by federal law.
(5) If, in the laying out, widening, or straightening of any highway it
becomes necessary to take private property, the commissioners or their di-
rector of highways shall cause a survey of the proposed highway to be made,
together with an accurate description of the lands required. The commis-
sioners shall endeavor to agree with each owner for the purchase of a right-
of-way over the owner's land included within the description. If they are
able to agree with the owner, the commissioners may purchase the land out of
the county highway fund under their control, and the land shall then be con-
veyed to the county for the use and purpose of highways.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.